Missouri, session 2026, HB3529.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 9.516, to read as follows:
9.516. June twenty-eighth each year is hereby designated as "Eliot and Muriel
Battle Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in
appropriate events and activities to celebrate the lives of Eliot Battle, the first Black
faculty member at Hickman High School in Columbia, and Muriel Battle, the first Black
principal in the Columbia Public School District. The couple worked as a team to ease
racial tensions during the 1960s and have been recognized with schools in Columbia
named in their honor: Eliot Battle Elementary School and Muriel Williams Battle High
School.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.